test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-dahkat_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - dahkat: # Verb 'do, make, produce'
     dahkat+V+Inf: dahkat
     dahkat+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: dagav
     dahkat+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: daga
     dahkat+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: dahka
     dahkat+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: dihkin
     dahkat+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: dahkabehtin #, dahkabähtten]
     dahkat+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: [dahkaba, dahkaban]
     dahkat+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: dahkap
     dahkat+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: dahkabehtit #, dahkabähttet]
     dahkat+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: dihki

     dahkat+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: dihkiv
     dahkat+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: dihki
     dahkat+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: dagaj
     dahkat+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: dagajmen
     dahkat+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: dagajden
     dahkat+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: [dagajga, dagajgan]
     dahkat+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: dagajme
     dahkat+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: dagajde
     dahkat+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: dihkin

     dahkat+V+Imprt+Sg2: daga  
     dahkat+V+Imprt+Du2: dahken
     dahkat+V+Imprt+Pl2: dihkit

#     dahkat+V+Pot+Sg1: dihkitjav
#     dahkat+V+Pot+Sg2: dihkitja
#     dahkat+V+Pot+Sg3: dihkitj
#     dahkat+V+Pot+Du1: dihkitjin
#     dahkat+V+Pot+Du2: dihkitjähppen #, burutjehpin]
#     dahkat+V+Pot+Du3: dihkitjiebá
#     dahkat+V+Pot+Pl1: dihkitjip
#     dahkat+V+Pot+Pl2: dihkitjihpit
#     dahkat+V+Pot+Pl3: dihkitji

     dahkat+V+ConNeg: daga 
     dahkat+V+GerI: dagadin 
#     dahkat+V+Sup: dagatjit
#     dahkat+V+Vabe: dahkak  
     dahkat+V+VGen: daga 
     dahkat+V+GerII: dahkamin
     dahkat+V+PrfPrc: dahkam
#     dahkat+V+PrsPrc: dahka 
#     dahkat+V+Vsubst: dahkam
